Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1214.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "board" in section 2001-L of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is repealed:Section 2001-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *["Board." The State Board of Higher Education established 12345678910111213141516171819202122 under section 2010-L.]* * *Section 2. Subarticle B of Article XX-L of the act is repealed:[SUBARTICLE BCOORDINATION OF HIGHER EDUCATIONSection 2010-L. State Board of Higher Education.(a) Establishment.--The State Board of Higher Education is established within the department.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the board is to provide direction, coordination and support to ensure that institutions of higher education fully meet the workforce and economic development needs of this Commonwealth and ensure that all residents of this Commonwealth have access to affordable, world-class postsecondary education.(c) Membership and appointment.--The board shall consist of the voting members specified in this subsection. In making appointments to the board, the Governor shall ensure that the appointee is a Pennsylvania resident and has the background and experience suitable for performing the statutory responsibility of a member of the board. Membership of the board shall be as follows:(1) The Secretary of Education or a designee who shall be an employee of the department.(2) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee who shall be an employee of the Department of Labor and Industry.(3) One member of the Senate appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate or a designee who shall be an employee of the Senate.20260SB1214PN1495 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) One member of the Senate appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate or a designee who shall be an employee of the Senate.(5) One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives or a designee who shall be an employee of the House of Representatives.(6) One member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives or a designee who shall be an employee of the House of Representatives.(7) Members appointed by the Governor, in accordance with paragraph (8), as follows:(i) One representative of a State-owned university who must be a president, administrator or local trustee.(ii) One representative of the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education.(iii) One representative of a community college who must be a president, administrator or board member.(iv) One representative of an independent institution of higher education who must be a president, administrator or board member.(v) Four representatives, one from each State-related university, who must be presidents, chancellors, administrators or local trustees.(vi) Two representatives of a union representing employees at public institutions of higher education who may not be from the same institutions of higher education as the representatives under subparagraph (i) or (iii).(vii) Two representatives of business.(viii) Two student representatives, one of whom is a 20260SB1214PN1495 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 student at an independent institution and one of whom is a student at a public institution of higher education.(ix) One representative of the Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology.(8) The Governor shall make the appointments under:(i) paragraph (7)(iii) from a list of three names submitted by the Pennsylvania Commission for Community Colleges;(ii) paragraph (7)(iv) from a list of three names submitted by the Association of Independent Colleges and Universities; and(iii) paragraph (7)(vii) from a list of five names submitted by the Pennsylvania Chamber of Business and Industry.(9) If an entity under paragraph (8) fails to submit a list within 20 days of the establishment of the board or of a vacancy of a member under paragraph (7), the Governor shall appoint a qualified individual to fill the vacancy.(d) Term.--The term of office of appointed members under subsection (c)(7)(i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vii) and (ix) shall be for a period of six years or until a successor is appointed and qualified, except that, of the initial appointees, the Governor shall designate three members to serve terms of two years, four members to serve terms of four years and four members to serve terms of six years. The Secretary of Education and the Secretary of Labor and Industry shall serve as long as they continue in office. Members of the board appointed by the General Assembly shall serve a term of office concurrent with their respective elective terms as members of the General Assembly. The student members appointed by the Governor under 20260SB1214PN1495 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (c)(7)(viii) shall serve a term of two years or upon graduation, separation or failure to maintain good academic standing at the institution of higher education in which the students are enrolled. The members under subsection (c)(7)(vi) may not serve more than one consecutive term of two years and may not be from the same union.(e) Organization.--The Governor shall designate a chair and vice chair of the board. The members shall select from among themselves such officers as they deem necessary.(f) Quorum and meetings.--(1) A majority of members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business.(2) The board shall meet to conduct official business no less than once every three months or by the call of the chair.(g) Expenses.--Members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for the expenses necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their duties.(h) Initial appointment and vacancies.--An appointing authority shall appoint members to the board within 30 days of the establishment of the board. If a vacancy occurs on the board, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor member within 30 days of the vacancy.(i) Removal of board members.--An appointed member who fails to attend three consecutive board meetings shall forfeit their membership on the board, unless the chair, upon written request from the member, determines that the member should be excused from a meeting or meetings for good cause.(j) Administrative services and staff.--(1) The board shall select an individual to serve as the 20260SB1214PN1495 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 executive director.(2) The department shall, in consultation with the executive director, provide administrative services and additional staff to the board. The board shall be entitled to legal counsel as designated by the Office of General Counsel.(k) Applicability.--In addition to all applicable laws, regulations and policies, the following acts shall apply to the board:(1) The act of July 19, 1957 (P.L.1017, No.451), known as the State Adverse Interest Act.(2) The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) The provisions of 65 Pa.C.S. Chs. 7 (relating to open meetings) and 11 (relating to ethics standards and financial disclosure).Section 2011-L. Powers and duties of State Board of Higher Education.(a) General rule.--The board is charged with promoting quality, accessible and affordable postsecondary education throughout this Commonwealth by developing, planning and advancing the higher education policy agenda of the Commonwealth to address the challenges facing Pennsylvania.(b) General powers.--The board shall have and may exercise all powers appropriate to carry out and effectuate the board's purposes under this article, including, but not limited to:(1) Adopt bylaws, if necessary.(2) Make and execute contracts, grants and other instruments in accordance with this article.(3) Apply for and receive money from any source consistent with the purposes of this article.20260SB1214PN1495 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Establish subcommittees and advisory committees composed as the chair or board deems necessary.(5) Hold public hearings, solicit public comment and seek stakeholder input on the direction of higher education in this Commonwealth.(6) Perform other operational activities necessary or appropriate to further the purposes of this article.(c) Duties.--The board shall perform all duties appropriate to carry out and effectuate the board's purposes under this article, including, but not limited to:(1) Develop and advance a higher education strategic plan and make recommendations that promote greater postsecondary access, quality, affordability and accountability.(2) Develop policy recommendations, including:(i) New programs to align to workforce needs.(ii) Efficient and effective use of State money for higher education.(3) (i) Create and maintain a database for the collection and analysis of postsecondary data to inform the board's policy recommendations and assess the progress of the strategic plan goals, including postsecondary education and workforce outcomes.(ii) Data collection under this paragraph shall be limited and reduced to the extent feasible.(iii) To the extent possible, the board shall prioritize collecting information from data reported to Federal and State entities and accrediting agencies.(iv) Annually, the board shall report postsecondary data elements collected from institutions of higher 20260SB1214PN1495 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education under this paragraph. The report shall be transmitted to the General Assembly and posted on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(v) The provisions of section 118 shall not apply to data collected under this paragraph.(4) Promote the coordination and cooperation of institutions of higher education to increase postsecondary credentials and degrees to:(i) Increase broad access to high quality and affordable postsecondary credentials and degrees.(ii) Promote the seamless transfer of credits and credentials, including increasing community college transfers to institutions of higher education.(iii) Utilize dual-enrollment credit to create strong pathways to postsecondary education and reduce time to degree.(iv) Meet the economic and workforce development needs of this Commonwealth with a focus on meeting the needs of current and future high-priority occupations.(5) In conjunction with the K-12 sector, coordinate workforce development and economic development sectors, with a focus on meeting the needs of high-priority occupations, to develop affordable pathways to postsecondary credentials that are aligned to current and future workforce and economic needs.(7) At the request of an institution of higher education, assist institutions of higher education with assessing their fiscal health and provide technical support.(8) Recommend to the General Assembly employer incentives to assist employees with attaining skills by 20260SB1214PN1495 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 focusing on career and technical degree programs in high-priority occupations.(9) Develop recommendations for repurposing and reducing underutilized facilities and maximizing their use.(d) Transfer of powers and duties.--(1) All powers and duties of the State Board of Education and the Council of Higher Education under Article XIX-A shall be transferred to the board. This paragraph does not apply to any application for a withdrawal of sponsorship under section 1910-A filed prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(2) All powers and duties of the State Board of Education and the Council of Higher Education under Article XXVI-B related to community colleges shall be transferred to the board.(3) All files, records, contracts, agreements and other materials which are used by the State Board of Education or the Council of Higher Education in connection with the powers, duties or functions exercised by the State Board of Education or the Council of Higher Education related to community colleges are hereby transferred to the board.(4) A regulation adopted under Article XIX-A shall be enforced by the board in collaboration with the State Board of Education and shall continue to have the same force and effect until modified or revised by the board. The board may promulgate regulations in order to implement this subsection.(5) The board, in consultation with the State Board of Education, shall make recommendations to the Governor and General Assembly no later than May 1, 2025, regarding the appropriate delineation of roles and responsibilities of the 20260SB1214PN1495 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board, State Board of Education and department related to higher education, including recommended legislation to update Articles XIX-A and XXVI-B, and other related provisions of this act.(e) Coordination with State and local entities.--The board shall:(1) In consultation with the department, promote strong pathways from grades K-12 through postsecondary credentials and degrees.(2) In consultation with the State Board of Education, promote greater postsecondary access, quality and affordability, including the use and quality of dual credit, apprenticeships and career and technical pathways.(3) In consultation with the Pennsylvania Workforce Development Board and local workforce development boards, support institutions of higher education to offer programs in high-priority occupations and apprenticeships that meet this Commonwealth's current and future workforce needs.(4) In consultation with the State Board of Private Licensed Schools, make legislative recommendations related to the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act.(f) Closure of institutions of higher education.--(1) No later than July 1, 2026, the board shall develop procedures for an institution of higher education to follow when the institution of higher education, whether or not chartered in this Commonwealth, proposes taking action to discontinue operations. The procedures shall include a plan for the orderly closure of the institution of higher education, including, but not limited to, a teach-out plan, 20260SB1214PN1495 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 preservation and accessibility of student and administrative records, and notification to employees as required by 29 U.S.C. Ch. 23 (relating to worker adjustment and retraining notification).(2) The board may, contingent on the availability of funds, enter into an agreement with a third party to establish a centralized repository of student and employee records for an institution of higher education that closes and fails to place student records into a readily accessible depository. An institution of higher education proposing to discontinue operations may request assistance from the board relating to discontinuance of the institution of higher education's operations.(3) To the extent permitted by Federal and State law, Commonwealth funds may be withheld from an institution of higher education provided that:(i) No funds may be withheld prior to the institution of higher education's formal vote and subsequent notification of closure.(ii) No funds may be withheld from services which have been previously provided or will be provided prior to the date of closure.(iii) No funds provided for student financial aid may be withheld on the basis of this section prior to the date of closure or at such time that the student is no longer enrolled at the institution of higher education.Section 2012-L. Annual funding request.In addition to the submission required under section 610 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, a public institution of higher 20260SB1214PN1495 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education shall provide a copy of its budget request to the board.Section 2013-L. Long-term strategic planning.(a) Development of strategic plan.--The board shall be responsible for developing a higher education strategic plan for the Commonwealth which shall:(1) Identify long-term, measurable goals and provide strategies for implementing those goals.(2) Assess the higher education needs of this Commonwealth as well as each region of this Commonwealth.(3) Include components required of the master plan for higher education under section 2603-B(h).(b) Adoption of strategic plan.--No later than September 1, 2025, the board shall adopt a higher education strategic plan. The plan shall be reviewed and revised, as necessary, every five years.(c) Consultation.--In development of the strategic plan, the board shall:(1) Consult with and seek input from stakeholders.(2) Make the strategic plan available for review and public comment for a period of not less than 30 days.(3) Hold at least six regional public hearings as part of the public comment process under paragraph (2).(d) Annual reports.--Beginning May 1, 2026, and each May 1 thereafter, the board shall develop an annual report which shall include an update on the progress of the implementation of the higher education strategic plan. As part of the first annual report, the board shall include a review and make recommendations related to the efficacy of the structure and operation of the board.20260SB1214PN1495 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Transmittal of strategic plan and annual reports.--The board shall post the strategic plan and annual reports on its publicly accessible Internet website and transmit them to the following individuals:(1) The Governor.(2) The General Assembly.(3) The president of each institution of higher education.(4) The president of each bargaining unit that represents employees at institutions of higher education.]Section 3. Sections 2032-L(i)(4) and 2033-L(e)(1) and (3)(ii) of the act, amended November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), are amended to read:Section 2032-L. Performance-based Funding Council.* * *(i) Powers and duties.--The council:* * *(4) Shall, no later than May 5, 2025, transmit the recommendations to the Governor, [the board,] the department and the General Assembly, including draft legislation to implement the process to distribute funding.* * *Section 2033-L. Public institution of higher education reporting.* * *(e) Data sharing.--[(1) The department may share data collected under this section with the board.]* * *(3) The following shall apply to confidential data 20260SB1214PN1495 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shared under this subsection:* * *[(ii) The department shall enter into a data use agreement with the board prior to sharing data under paragraph (1) and include the same terms in subparagraph (i).]* * *Section 4. The following provisions apply to the abolishment of the State Board of Higher Education under this act:(1) All powers and duties transferred to the State Board of Higher Education under former section 2011-L(d)(1) of the act revert immediately to the State Board of Education and the Council of Higher Education, respectively, consistent with Article XIX-A of the act. This paragraph does not apply to any application for a withdrawal of sponsorship under section 1910-A of the act filed with the State Board of Higher Education prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(2) All powers and duties transferred to the State Board of Higher Education under former section 2011-L(d)(2) of the act revert immediately to the State Board of Education and the Council of Higher Education, respectively, consistent with Article XXVI-B of the act relating to community colleges.(3) All files, records, contracts, agreements and other materials, except for any student-level data collected by the Department of Education, used by the State Board of Higher Education in connection with its powers, duties or functions are transferred to the State Board of Education or the Council of Higher Education, respectively, consistent with 20260SB1214PN1495 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraphs (1) and (2).(4) A regulation adopted under Article XIX-A of the act and continued under former section 2011-L(d)(4) of the act shall be enforced by the State Board of Education and shall continue to have the same force and effect until modified or revised by the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education may promulgate regulations in order to implement this paragraph.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1214PN1495 - 15 - 123456789